Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 160.1 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act:
1. "Bone marrow donor" means a person from whose body bone
marrow is taken to be transferred to the body of another person;


Req. No. 16012 Page 1

2. "Organ" means a human organ that is capable of being
transferred from the body of a person to the body of another person,
including, but not limited to, eyes;
3. "Organ donor" means a person from whose body an organ is
taken to be transferred to the body of another person; and
4. "Private employer" means a sole proprietor, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, or other entity with one (1)
or more employees. A private employer does not include a
municipality, county, state agency, institution of higher education,
or other public employer.
B. 1. In addition to any medical, personal, or other paid
leave provided by the employer, a private employer shall grant an
employee an unpaid leave of absence to allow the employee to serve
as an organ donor or a bone marrow donor if the employee requests a
leave of absence in writing;
2. The length of the leave of absence shall be equal to the
time requested by the employee or ninety (90) days, whichever is
less; and
3. A private employer may grant a paid or unpaid leave of
absence for a length of time greater than ninety (90) days.
C. If a private employer agrees to pay the employee's regular
salary or wages during the leave of absence required pursuant to
subsection B of this section, then the private employer is entitled

Req. No. 16012 Page 2

to a credit against the private employer's Oklahoma withholding tax
liability.
1. The amount of the credit provided in subsection C of this
section shall be equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the regular
salary or wages paid to the employee while the employee was on a
leave of absence required pursuant to subsection B of this section;
2. If the private employer grants the employee a leave of
absence greater than ninety (90) days, the credit provided pursuant
to subsection C of this section shall be limited to the regular
salary or wages paid during the first ninety (90) days of the leave
of absence; and
3. The credit shall be taken within one (1) year of the date
upon which the leave required pursuant to subsection B of this
section begins.
D. This section shall not apply if the employee is eligible for
leave pursuant to the Family Medical Leave Act, 29 U.S.C., Section
2601 et seq.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16012 TJ 01/29/26




Req. No. 16012 Page 3